Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 2. Examination

§ 13-8-201.
Generally.

If the laws of the state, under which any foreign association is organized, require annual examinations of the association and are made pursuant to that law, then the foreign association need not be examined under this section but the foreign association shall annually furnish the state banking commissioner a certificate of the proper officer of the other state that he has made an examination pursuant to the laws of that state and that the affairs of the association are in accord with the laws of that state. The state banking commissioner may, however, when he deems it advisable, cause an examination of the foreign association to be made as is required of domestic associations.

If the state banking commissioner has good reason to doubt the solvency of any foreign association doing business in this state and if he is not fully satisfied with the certificate of the president and secretary or other officer, he shall proceed to make an examination of the association.

If the state banking commissioner finds that the foreign association has made fraudulent or untrue statements or that it is conducting its business in an irregular manner, or if he believes that an association in this state is conducting its business fraudulently or is not in good faith carrying out its contracts with its members or stockholders in this state, or if the contracts, shares or savings certificates are sold under misrepresentation or if it appears that the association is otherwise violating the provisions of this act, he shall inform the attorney general who shall then commence proceedings by writ of quo warranto against the association requiring it to show cause why its license to do business in this state should not be revoked.

The state banking commissioner shall collect from foreign state savings and loan associations doing business in this state when examined in association with the supervisory authorities of the foreign state or federal government, an amount equal to the total cost of making an examination and preparing a report and the necessary travel and other expenses incident to making the examination. The examination fees and expenses shall be deposited by the state banking commissioner with the state treasurer and credited to the financial institutions administration account. Expenditures shall be made from the account by warrants drawn by the state auditor, upon vouchers issued and signed by the director or commissioner. Funds from the account shall be expended only to carry out the duties of the commissioner or the state banking board.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 24; R.S. 1931, § 17-124; C.S. 1945, § 36-127; W.S. 1957, § 13-239; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1994, ch. 14, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to quo warranto, see chapter 31 of title 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 13-8-202.
Liquidation.

If it is necessary to liquidate the assets within this state of any foreign association under any provisions of the laws of this state or by reason of receivership proceedings instituted in another state, the state banking commissioner shall be appointed receiver for that purpose, without compensation and with the power to appoint assistants as provided in W.S.

13-4-305

.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 10, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 36-121; W.S. 1957, § 13-234; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.